Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_Consonant1th.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascConstant1thStem;

LEXICON NounMascConstant1thStem   

කුලවත NounMascConstant1;
ගුණවත NounMascConstant1;
ජගත NounMascConstant1;
දුප්පත NounMascConstant1;
ධනවත NounMascConstant1;
නූගත NounMascConstant1;
පිංවත NounMascConstant1;
පින්වත NounMascConstant1;
පුත NounMascConstant1;
පෙම්වත NounMascConstant1;
පොහොසත NounMascConstant1;
පෝසත NounMascConstant1;
බලවත NounMascConstant1;
බැතිමත NounMascConstant1;
බීමත NounMascConstant1;
බුද්ධිමත NounMascConstant1;
භවත NounMascConstant1;
මිනිස NounMascConstant1;
යුෂ්මත NounMascConstant1;
රසවත NounMascConstant1;
වංශවත NounMascConstant1;
විද්වත NounMascConstant1;
වියත NounMascConstant1;
ශක්තිමත NounMascConstant1;
සත NounMascConstant1;
සමත NounMascConstant1;
සැදැහැවත NounMascConstant1;
සිල්වත NounMascConstant1;
හිතවත NounMascConstant1;




LEXICON NounMascConstant1


්+N+RT+PL+ACC:්තු  #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:්තුත්  #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:්තුයි  #;
